Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-1015
Obstruction, defined.

Obstruction shall mean any wall, wharf, embankment, levee, dike, pile, abutment, projection, excavation, channel rectification, bridge, conduit, culvert, building, wire, fence, rock, gravel, refuse, fill, or other analogous structure or matter which may impede, retard, or change the direction of the flow of water, either in itself or by catching or collecting debris carried by such water, or that is placed where the natural flow of the water would carry such structure or matter downstream to the damage or detriment of either life or property. Obstruction shall not include a dam designed to store or divert water for which permission for construction has been obtained from the Chief Water Officer pursuant to the Safety of Dams and Reservoirs Act.

Laws 1983, LB 35, § 15;

Laws 1993, LB 626, § 3;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 77;

Laws 2005, LB 335, § 72;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 56.

Safety of Dams and Reservoirs Act, see section 46-1601.